Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.130

Certificate not withheld for informality in returns.

No certificate shall be withheld on account of any defect or informality in the returns of any election, if it can with reasonable certainty be ascertained from such return what office is intended, and who is entitled to such certificate, nor shall any commission be withheld by the governor on account of any defect or informality of any return made to the office of the secretary of state.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1513. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.27.120; prior: Code 1881 s 3102; 1865 p 41 s 13; RRS s 5347. Formerly RCW 29.27.120.]